Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 50. Tobacco Taxes and Sales.

Administrative Code. —

For cigarette tax, see 15 AAC 50.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 1, FSSLA 2004 (SB 1001) making a series of amendments to this chapter, see 2004 Senate Journal 3839 — 3841.

Collateral references. —

51 Am. Jur. 2d, Licenses and Permits, §§ 4,
29-31

71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 521-523.

53 C.J.S., Licenses, § 34.